Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202610-131
Bonds of municipal corporation or political subdivision; signatures.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the statutes of the State of Nebraska with respect to the issuance of bonds, interest coupons, and other evidence of indebtedness by any county, city, village, municipal county, school district, public power district, public power and irrigation district, airport authority, community improvement district, sanitary and improvement district, or any other municipal corporation or political subdivision, if any bond or other evidence of indebtedness is signed by more than one officer of such issuer, one of the signatures shall be manually affixed thereto and the other signatures may be facsimile signatures of such officers, and with respect to any interest coupons appertaining to any bond or evidence of indebtedness, the signatures on such interest coupon may be facsimile signatures.

Laws 1977, LB 265, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 22;

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 61.
April 17, 2026